Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB401.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 18A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "rapid whole genome sequencing":
(a) Means an investigation of the entire human genome, including coding and
non-coding regions and mitochondrial deoxyribonucleic acid, to identify
disease-causing genetic changes that returns the preliminary positive results
within seven (7) days and final results within fifteen (15) days from the date
of receipt of the sample by the laboratory preforming the test; and
(b) Includes:
1. Patient-only whole genome sequencing;
2. Duo sequencing of the patient and one (1) biological parent; and
3. Trio sequencing of the patient and both biological parents.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any fully insured or self-
insured health benefit plan, as defined in KRS 304.17A-005, offered, issued, or
renewed to public employees under KRS 18A.225, 18A.2254, or any other
provision of this chapter shall provide coverage and reimbursement for rapid
whole genome sequencing when the insured:
(a) Is under twenty-one (21) years of age;
(b) Has a complex and acute illness of unknown etiology that is not confirmed
to be caused by environmental exposure, toxic ingestion, infection with
normal response to therapy, or trauma; and
(c) Is receiving hospital services in an intensive care unit or other high-acuity
care unit within a hospital.
(3) Coverage required under this section shall be subject to applicable evidence-
based medical necessity criteria that shall include but may not be limited to:
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/6/2025 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1087
(a) The patient has symptoms that suggest a broad differential diagnosis that
would require evaluation by multiple genetic tests if rapid whole genome
sequencing is not performed;
(b) The patient has a determination from the patient's treating healthcare
provider that:
1. Timely identification of a molecular diagnosis is necessary to guide
the clinical decision-making process; and
2. Testing results may guide treatment or management of the patient's
clinical condition; and
(c) The patient has a complex or acute illness of unknown etiology, including
at least one (1) of the following:
1. Congenital anomalies involving at least two (2) organ systems or
complex or multiple anomalies in one (1) organ system;
2. Specific organ malformations which are highly suggestive of a genetic
etiology;
3. Abnormal laboratory test results or abnormal chemistry profiles that
suggest the presence of a genetic disease, complex metabolic disorder,
or inborn error of metabolism;
4. Refractory or severe hypoglycemia or hyperglycemia;
5. Abnormal response to therapy related to an underlying medical
condition affecting vital organs or bodily systems;
6. Severe muscle weakness, rigidity, or spasticity;
7. Refractory seizures;
8. A high-risk stratification on evaluation for a brief resolved
unexplained event with:
a. A recurrent event without respiratory infection;
b. A recurrent witnessed seizure-like event; or
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/6/2025 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1087
c. A recurrent cardiopulmonary resuscitation;
9. Abnormal cardiac diagnostic test results that suggest possible
channelopathies, arrhythmias, cardiomyopathies, myocarditis, or
structural heart disease;
10. Abnormal diagnostic imaging studies that suggest an underlying
genetic condition;
11. Abnormal physiologic function studies that suggest an underlying
genetic etiology;
12. A family history related to the patient's condition; or
13. Any other condition approved by the Department for Medicaid
Services based upon new medical evidence.
(4) (a) Genetic data generated from rapid whole genome sequencing covered under
this section has a primary use of assisting the ordering healthcare provider
and the treating care team to diagnose and treat the patient, is protected
health information, and is subject to the requirements of the federal Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and the federal Health
Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, genetic data generated
from rapid whole genome sequencing covered under this section may be
used in scientific research if informed consent for that use has been
expressly given by the patient, or the patient's legal guardian if the patient is
a minor. The patient, the patient's legal guardian, or the patient's
healthcare provider with the patient's informed consent may request access
to the results of the testing covered under this section for use in other
clinical settings.
(c) A patient, or a patient's legal guardian if the patient is a minor, may rescind
informed consent given under paragraph (b) of this subsection for the use
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/6/2025 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1087
of genetic data in scientific research at any time. Upon receipt of a written
revocation of consent, the patient's healthcare provider and any other
individual or entity using the genetic data shall cease use and expunge all of
the patient's genetic data from any data repository where the data is held.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/6/2025 3:51 PM Jacketed